California statutes. Public Resources Code
All moneys deposited in the fund that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this division shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except that amounts derived from premiums may be reserved and used to pay the cost of bond issuance prior to any transfer to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80171.

Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the cost of bond issuance shall be paid or reimbursed out of the bond proceeds, including premiums, if any. To the extent the cost of bond issuance is not paid from premiums received from the sale of bonds, these costs shall be allocated proportionally to each program funded through this division by the applicable bond sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80172.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds under this division shall include approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this division or any previously issued refunding bonds. Any bond refunded with the proceeds of a refunding bond as authorized by this section may be legally defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended from time to time, authorizing that refunded bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80173.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this division are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIII B of the California Constitution, and the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 47. FUEL REDUCTION WORK CONTRACTS [80200. - 80204.]

80200.

(a) Any fuel reduction work, including, but not limited to, residential chipping, rural road fuel breaks, and firebreaks, done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of public funds, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1720 of the Labor Code, except as specified in subdivision (b), subdivision (c), Section 80202, or Section 80203, shall be subject to the following standards:

(1) All workers employed in the execution of the contract to perform work that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades for which an apprenticeship program has been approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code shall be paid at least the general
 prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(2) All contractors and subcontractors shall maintain payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided in that section.

(3) A contractor shall be registered pursuant to Section 1725.6 of the Labor Code to be qualified to bid on, be awarded contracts for, or engage in the performance of, any work subject to the requirements of this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, “contractor” includes a subcontractor as defined by Section 1722.1 of
 the Labor Code.

(b) This division does not apply to fuel reduction work that is awarded by a federal entity using solely federal funds under which federal prevailing wage requirements apply.

(c) This division is applicable only to work performed under contract and is not applicable to work carried out by a public agency with its own forces.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 338)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 80204.)
-------------------------------------------

80201.

(a) The requirement to pay prevailing wages pursuant to this division may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code.

(b) If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section
 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 338)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 80204.)
-------------------------------------------

80202.

This division only applies to contracts in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 338)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 80204.)
-------------------------------------------

80203.

(a) This division does not apply to work performed on Indian lands, as defined in Section 2703 of Title 25 of the United States Code, nor to work performed under contract with a federally recognized Native American tribe.

(b) This division does not apply to prescribed fire or grazing work.

(c) This division does not apply to work performed on private land. That work shall be considered an exception to the definition of maintenance in Section 16000 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) This division does not apply to nonprofit organizations that directly contract with the state or a political
 subdivision until July 1, 2027, and does not apply to any contract, subcontract, or grant agreement between a nonprofit organization and the state or a political subdivision that is fully executed when this division becomes operative, unless the contract, subcontract, or grant agreement is renewed after July 1, 2027.

(e) This division does not apply to any workers who are currently exempt from public works requirements pursuant to Section 1720.4 of the Labor Code.

(f) This division does not apply to fuel reduction work performed by an inmate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 338)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 80204.)
-------------------------------------------

80204.

This division shall become operative on July 1, 2026, and does not apply to any contract, subcontract, or grant agreement that is fully executed when this division becomes operative, unless the contract, subcontract, or grant agreement is renewed after July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 338)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 50. SAFE DRINKING WATER, WILDFIRE PREVENTION, DROUGHT PREPAREDNESS, AND CLEAN AIR BOND ACT OF 2024 [90000. - 95015.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [90000. - 90620.]

90000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90050.

(a) In expending funds pursuant to this division, an administering state agency shall give priority to projects that leverage private, federal, and local funding or produce the greatest public benefit.

(b) To the extent practicable, a project funded pursuant to this division shall include signage informing the public that the project received funding from the Safe Drinking Water,
 Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024.

(c) Projects funded pursuant to this division shall, where appropriate, include the planning, monitoring, and reporting necessary to ensure successful implementation of this division’s objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90100.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Committee” means the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 95002.

(b) “Community” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 65302.10 of the
 Government Code.

(c) “Critical community infrastructure” means infrastructure that is necessary to providing vital community and individual functions, including, but not limited to, drinking and wastewater infrastructure, emergency shelters, communication and warning systems, evacuation routes, emergency power and public medical facilities, schools, town halls, hospitals, health clinics, community centers, community nonprofit facilities providing essential services, libraries, homeless shelters, senior and youth centers, childcare facilities, food banks, grocery stores, and parks and recreation sites.

(d) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income of less than 80 percent of the area average or less than 80 percent of statewide median household income.

(e) “Economically distressed
 areas” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 79702 of the Water Code.

(f) “Natural infrastructure” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 71154.

(g) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in California and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(h) “Protection” includes those actions necessary to prevent harm or damage to persons, property, or natural, cultural, and historic resources, actions to improve access to public open-space areas, or actions to allow the continued use and enjoyment of property or natural, cultural, and historic resources. Protection includes site monitoring, acquisition, development, restoration, preservation, and interpretation.

(i) (1) “Restoration” includes the improvement of physical structures or facilities and, in the case of natural systems and landscape features, includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) The control of erosion.

(B) Stormwater capture, treatment, reuse, and storage, or to otherwise reduce stormwater pollution.

(C) The control and elimination of invasive species and harmful algal blooms.

(D) The planting of native species.

(E) The removal of waste and debris.

(F) Prescribed burning and other fuel hazard reduction measures.

(G) Fencing out threats to existing or restored natural resources.

(H) Improving instream, riparian, floodplain, or wetland habitat conditions.

(I) Other plant and wildlife habitat improvement to increase the natural system value of the property or coastal or ocean resources.

(J) Activities described in subdivision (b) of Section 79737 of the Water Code.

(2) “Restoration” also includes activities, including the planning, permitting, monitoring, and reporting that are necessary to ensure successful implementation of the restoration objectives.

(j) “Severely disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income
 of less than 60 percent of the area average or less than 60 percent of statewide median household income.

(k) “Socially disadvantaged farmer or rancher” has the same meaning set forth in Section 512 of the Food and Agricultural Code. This provision shall apply to the extent allowable by law.

(l) “State General Obligation Bond Law” means the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as it may be amended from time to time.

(m) “Structure hardening” includes the installation, replacement, or retrofitting of building materials, systems, or assemblies used in the exterior design and construction of existing nonconforming structures with features that are in compliance with Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of
 Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or any appropriate successor regulatory code, with the primary purpose of reducing risk to structures from wildfire or conforming to the low-cost retrofit list, and updates to that list, developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 51189 of the Government Code.

(n) “Tribe” means a federally recognized Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(o) “Vulnerable population” means a subgroup of population within a region or community that faces a disproportionately heightened risk or increased sensitivity to impacts of climate change and that lacks adequate resources to cope with, adapt to, or recover from such impacts.

(p) “Water board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90105.

Funds provided by this division shall not be expended to fulfill any environmental mitigation requirements or compliance obligations imposed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90107.

Funds provided by this division shall not be expended to pay the costs of the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of isolated Delta conveyance facilities. Those costs shall be the responsibility of the water agencies that benefit from the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of those facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90110.

An eligible applicant under this division is a public agency, local agency, nonprofit organization, special district, joint powers authority, tribe, public utility, local publicly owned utility, or mutual water company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90115.

The Legislature may enact legislation necessary to implement programs funded by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90120.

It is the intent of the Legislature that bond moneys shall not be used for shareholder incentives or profits for shareholders of private corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90130.

For grants awarded for projects under this division, the administering agency may provide advanced payments in the amount of 25 percent of the grant award to the recipient, including state-related entities, to initiate the project in a timely manner. The administering agency shall adopt additional requirements for the recipient of the grant regarding the use of the advanced payments to ensure that the moneys are used properly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90133.

For grants awarded for projects under this division, the administering agency may, when awarding a grant, reimburse the grantee’s indirect costs. When reimbursing a grantee for indirect costs, the administering agency shall apply one of the following rates as requested by the grantee:

(a) The grantee’s negotiated indirect cost rate pursuant to its negotiated indirect cost rate agreement.

(b) The de minimis indirect cost rate specified in Part 200 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) A rate negotiated by the grantee with another state agency within the last five years.

(d) A rate proposed by the grantee in the grantee’s program application with the administering state agency if the grantee does not have an existing state rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90135.

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall publish a list of all program and project expenditures pursuant to this division not less than annually, in written form, and shall post an electronic form of the list on the agency’s internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format. The spreadsheet shall include all of the following information:

(1) Information about the location and footprint of each funded project.

(2) The project’s objectives.

(3) The status of the project.

(4) Anticipated outcomes.

(5) The public benefits to be derived from the project, including whether the project has meaningful and direct benefits to vulnerable populations, disadvantaged communities, or severely disadvantaged communities.

(6) The total cost of the project, if known.

(7) The amount of bond funding provided.

(8) Any matching moneys provided for the project by the grant recipient or other partners.

(9) The applicable chapter of this division pursuant to which the recipient received moneys.

(b) The Department of Finance shall provide for an independent audit of expenditures pursuant to this division. If an audit, required by law, of any entity that receives funding authorized by this
 division is conducted pursuant to state law and reveals any impropriety, the California State Auditor or the Controller may conduct or arrange for a full audit of any or all of the activities funded pursuant to this division. Any audit of a federal Department of Energy or National Aeronautics and Space Administration research and development center pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with the Federal Laboratory Contracting Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 12500) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(c) A state agency issuing any grant with funding authorized by this division shall require adequate reporting of the expenditures of the funding from the grant.

(d) The costs associated with the publications, audits, statewide bond tracking, cash management, and related oversight activities provided for in this section shall be funded from
 the proceeds of bonds authorized by this division. These costs shall be shared proportionally by each program funded by this division. Actual costs incurred to administer nongrant programs authorized by this division shall be paid from the proceeds of bonds authorized by this division.

(e) (1) A regulation for the purposes of developing and adopting program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the programs included in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 91000) to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 94500), inclusive, of this division may be adopted as an emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary
 for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. A state agency shall be exempt from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, an emergency regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be filed with, but not be repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law, and shall remain in effect until repealed or amended by the adopting state agency.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a regulation for the purpose of developing and adopting program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the programs included in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 91000) to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 94500), inclusive, of this division, may be
 adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the programs included in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 91000) to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 94500), inclusive, of this division. 

(3) Before disbursing grants pursuant to this division, a state entity that receives funding to administer a competitive grant program, established using the exemption pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subdivision, shall do all of the following:

(A) Develop draft project solicitation and evaluation guidelines.

(B) Transmit
 copies of the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines to the fiscal committees and to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, publish the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines on its internet website for a public comment period of at least 30 days, and hold a noticed public meeting on the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines. All written public comments received shall be posted on the state entity’s internet website, unless indicated otherwise by the person who provided the written public comment. The state entity shall respond in writing to each public comment.

(C) Offer opportunity for tribal consultation to impacted tribes.

(D) After completing the requirements contained in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, finalize project solicitation and evaluation guidelines.

(E) (i) Submit the final guidelines to the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall verify that the guidelines are consistent with applicable statutes and for all the purposes enumerated in this division. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall post an electronic form of the guidelines submitted by a state entity and the subsequent verifications on the Natural Resources Agency’s internet website.

(ii) The requirement to submit final guidelines to the Secretary of the Natural Resources shall not apply to the State Water Resources Control Board.

(F) Upon adoption, transmit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), if a state entity, before the
 effective date of the act adding this paragraph, developed and adopted project solicitation and evaluation guidelines that comply with the requirements of this division for a program described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 91000) to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 94500), inclusive, of this division, the use of those guidelines shall constitute compliance with the requirements of this subdivision.

(5) The requirements contained in this subdivision do not apply to the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement any program that is funded by any appropriation made in the Budget Act of 2025, or in any bill identified in Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund established pursuant to Section 90500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   (AB 35)   Effective July 16, 2026.   Note: Added by Prop. 4 at the Nov. 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

90140.

At least 40 percent of the total funds available pursuant to this division shall be allocated for projects that provide meaningful and direct benefits to vulnerable populations or disadvantaged communities. At least 10 percent of the total funds available pursuant to this division shall be allocated for projects that provide meaningful and direct benefits to severely disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90150.

To the extent feasible, a project whose application includes the use of services of the California Conservation Corps or certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5, shall be given preference for receipt of a grant under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90500.

(a) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, exclusive of refunding bonds issued and sold pursuant to Section 95012, shall be deposited in the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of this division.

(b) Proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be allocated according to the following schedule:

(1) Three billion eight hundred million dollars ($3,800,000,000) for safe drinking water, drought, flood, and water resilience programs, in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 91000).

(2) One billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000) for wildfire and forest resilience programs, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 91500).

(3) One billion two hundred million dollars ($1,200,000,000) for coastal resilience programs, in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 92000).

(4) Four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000) for
 extreme heat mitigation programs, in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 92500).

(5) One billion two hundred million dollars ($1,200,000,000) for biodiversity protection and nature-based climate solution programs, in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 93000).

(6) Three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) for climate-smart, sustainable, and resilient farms, ranches, and working lands programs, in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 93500).

(7) Seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000) for park creation and outdoor access programs, in accordance with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94000).

(8) Eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000) for clean air programs, in accordance with Chapter 9
 (commencing with Section 94500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90600.

(a) An amount that equals not more than the lesser of 7 percent of the funds or twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) allocated for a grant program pursuant to this division may be used to pay the administrative costs of that program.

(b) (1) Up to 10 percent of the funds available pursuant to each chapter of this division may be allocated for technical
 assistance to disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. The agency administering the moneys shall operate a multidisciplinary technical assistance program for disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(2) Funds used for providing technical assistance to disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations may exceed 10 percent of the funds allocated under each chapter of this division if the state agency administering the moneys determines that there is a need for the additional funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90610.

To the extent practicable, a project that receives moneys pursuant to this division may provide workforce education and training, contractor, and job opportunities for vulnerable populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

90620.

Funds allocated pursuant to this division may be used by the Natural Resources Agency and its departments, boards, and conservancies to collaboratively fund projects at a landscape or multijurisdictional scale to provide multiple benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Safe Drinking Water, Drought, Flood, and Water Resilience [91000. - 91050.]

91000.

The sum of three billion eight hundred million dollars ($3,800,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for safe drinking water, drought, flood, and water resilience programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91010.

Of the funds made available by Section 91000, one billion eight hundred eighty-five million dollars ($1,885,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to protect and increase California water supply and water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91011.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91010, six hundred ten million dollars ($610,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the water board for grants or loans that improve water quality or help provide clean, safe, and reliable drinking water. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Projects that help to
 provide clean, safe, and reliable drinking water.

(2) Projects that increase water quality monitoring and remediation of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.

(3) Innovative projects to increase the affordability of safe drinking water.

(4) Projects that implement countywide drought and water shortage contingency plans adopted pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10609.40) of Part 2.55 of Division 6 of the Water Code.

(5) Projects that prevent, reduce, or treat the contamination of groundwater that serves as a major source of drinking water for a community.

(6) Projects to consolidate water or wastewater systems or to extend wastewater service to residences currently
 served by inadequate onsite sewer treatment systems.

(7) Grants for projects and technical and financial assistance to address hexavalent chromium in drinking water.

(8) (A) Tribal water infrastructure projects that provide safe, clean, and reliable drinking water to tribal communities.

(B) Not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be allocated to projects described in subparagraph (A).

(b) If there is a responsible party identified to have contributed to contamination of a drinking water well, or system, the water system or public agency responsible for the infrastructure may apply for competitive state grant program funding for a drinking water infrastructure project to address water quality issues. The grant
 applicant may apply for funding in the amount above and beyond what the responsible party is required to contribute to the infrastructure project.

(c) Reasonable geographic allocation to eligible projects throughout the state shall be considered, including both northern and southern California and inland and coastal regions.

(d) At least 40 percent of the allocation made pursuant to this section shall benefit disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations.

(e) For severely disadvantaged communities with populations of no more than 500 persons that serve no more than 100 service connections, there shall be no maximum amount per service connection for eligible projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91012.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91010, three hundred eighty-six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($386,250,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Water Resources for projects related to groundwater storage, groundwater banking, groundwater recharge, or instream flow projects that support the conjunctive use of groundwater and surface water supplies. Of the funds made available
 pursuant to this subdivision, a minimum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be for projects that provide direct benefits to tribal communities.

(b) Of the funds made available by subdivision (a), one hundred ninety-three million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($193,125,000) shall be available for projects that increase groundwater storage, improve the management and operation of groundwater storage, or are for groundwater banking, and support implementation of the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6 of the Water Code).

(c) (1) Of the funds made available by subdivision (a), one hundred ninety-three million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($193,125,000) shall be available for projects that support conjunctive use and groundwater recharge. The projects shall provide
 the following benefits:

(A) Provide improved regional watershed management.

(B) Address current and projected drought conditions and demonstrate adaptation to climate change for a region.

(C) Provide ecosystem benefits to fish and wildlife and improve stream flow for anadromous fish.

(2) Reasonable geographic allocation to eligible projects throughout the state shall be considered, including both northern and southern California and inland and coastal regions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91013.

Of the funds made available by Section 91010, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Conservation’s Multibenefit Land Repurposing Program for groundwater sustainability projects that reduce groundwater use, repurpose irrigated agricultural land, provide wildlife habitat, improve drought resilience or floodwater management, or support implementation of the Sustainable Groundwater
 Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6 of the Water Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91014.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 91010, three hundred eighty-six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($386,250,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the water board for grants and projects related to water reuse and recycling, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Treatment, storage, conveyance, and distribution facilities
 for potable and nonpotable recycling projects.

(2) Dedicated distribution infrastructure to serve residential, commercial, agricultural, and industrial end user retrofit projects to allow use of recycled water.

(3) Multiple-benefit recycled water projects that improve water quality.

(b) At least a 50-percent local cost share shall be required for projects funded pursuant to this section. That cost share may be suspended or reduced for disadvantaged communities or severely disadvantaged communities, or prorated for disadvantaged communities or severely disadvantaged communities within a larger service area project. A loan, grant, or other funding received, regardless of funding source, shall qualify as local cost share.

(c) The water board shall adopt
 modified grant funding requirements for large-scale water recycling or reuse projects, including all of the following requirements:

(1) Ancillary facilities that are part of large-scale water recycling or reuse projects shall be eligible for funding. Ancillary facilities include, but are not limited to, pipelines, extraction wells, injection wells, recharge basins, and nitrogen removal treatment systems, pertinent structures, and connection assemblies.

(2) This section does not preclude the water board from awarding funding to a large-scale water recycling or reuse project for multiple project phases or components, or more than once during the project development period. The water board shall not require user agreements or contracts for water delivery, nor shall full completion of the project be required before the submission of a subsequent grant application, as a condition for
 award of grant funding.

(3) At least 10 percent of the grant funding shall be awarded for the purpose of planning and design.

(4) Reasonable geographic allocation to eligible projects throughout the state, including both northern and southern California and coastal and inland regions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

91015.
